Colorado statutes. TITLE 20 District Attorneys
PART 3
COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES

20-1-301. Compensation of district attorneys.

Commencing January 1, 1997, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than sixty-seven thousand dollars per annum.
(1) (a) (I) Commencing January 1, 1997, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than sixty-seven thousand dollars per annum.

Effective January 1, 2009, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than one hundred thousand dollars per annum.

Effective January 1, 2010, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than one hundred ten thousand dollars per annum.

Effective January 1, 2011, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than one hundred twenty thousand dollars per annum.

Effective January 1, 2012, and for each year thereafter, in every judicial district the district attorney shall receive as compensation for his or her services the sum of not less than one hundred thirty thousand dollars per annum.

Any amount in excess of the compensation amount set pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be set by the board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties comprising the judicial district or the city council of the city and county of Denver for the second judicial district.

During the regular legislative session commencing January 2012, and every fourth legislative session thereafter, the judiciary committees of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees, shall review the compensation of elected district attorneys and make recommendations, if appropriate, to the general assembly regarding the compensation of elected district attorneys.

A district attorney shall not engage in the private practice of law, nor shall he receive any income from any private law firm.

Source:

L. 48, Ex. Sess.:

p. 21, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 66, § 52(4).

CRS 53:

§ 45-2-1.

L. 55:

p. 289, § 1.

L. 59:

pp. 378, 380, §§ 1, 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-1.

L. 67:

pp. 596, 599, §§ 1, 6.

L. 72:

p. 295, § 2.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 659, § 1, effective June 26.

L. 76:

(1) amended, p. 592, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(1) amended, p. 577, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 577, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 580, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 194, § 12, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1609, § 1, effective May 31.

20-1-302. Expenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the district attorneys of each judicial district in the state of Colorado shall be entitled to collect and receive at the end of each month, of and from the respective counties in the district attorney's judicial district, the necessary expenses of maintaining an office for the transaction of official business, which expenses shall be borne by the various counties in the judicial district, each in the proportion that the population of such county bears to the population of the whole judicial district, according to the last preceding population estimate that is prepared before May 1 of the current year by the division of planning in the department of local affairs pursuant to section 24-32-204, C.R.S. With the agreement of all of the boards of county commissioners of the judicial district, the funding allocation provisions of this section may be modified. Nothing in part 2 of this article or this part 3 shall prohibit any municipality, county, or government entity from agreeing to fund programs, projects, personnel, or salaries that are in addition to the funds provided for the reasonable and necessary expenses of the district attorney with the agreement of the relevant board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 411, § 2.

CSA:

C. 66, § 93.

CRS 53:

§ 45-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 188, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1884, § 1, effective June 4.

20-1-303. District attorneys allowed necessary expenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the district attorney of each judicial district in the state of Colorado, and each of his assistants and deputies, shall be allowed to collect and receive from each of the counties in his district the expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of his official duties for the benefit of such county.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 371, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2107.

C.L.

§ 5992.

CSA:

C. 55, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 45-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-5.

20-1-304. District attorney and employees authorized to receive benefits. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 343, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-7.

L. 76:

Entire section repealed, p. 637, § 2, effective January 11, 1977.

20-1-305. Benefits not considered compensation or increase in emoluments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 343, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-8.

L. 76:

Entire section repealed, p. 637, § 2, effective January 1, 1977.

20-1-306. Salaries paid from state and county funds.

The salaries of district attorneys of the several judicial districts of the state as set forth in section 20-1-301 (1)(a) shall be paid in twelve equal monthly installments of which the state shall contribute eighty percent annually and the counties making up each district the balance, each county's payment to be in the same proportion as provided in section 20-1-302.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 295, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 45-2-9.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 659, § 2, effective June 26.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 592, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 577, § 2, effective May 9.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 188, § 2, effective April 13; entire section amended, p. 580, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 195, § 13, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1610, § 2, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section in House Bill 95-1215 and House Bill 95-1340 were harmonized.

20-1-307. Social security coverage.

The office of district attorney, including the district attorney and the employees of each office within each judicial district, is a juristic entity as described in section 24-53-101, C.R.S. Each office of district attorney shall enter into an agreement with the director of the division of unemployment insurance in the department of labor and employment for the purpose of including the district attorney and the employees of the district attorney's office under the state's federal-state social security coverage agreement with the secretary of the United States department of health and human services pursuant to section 24-53-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 75:

p. 661, § 1, effective March 21.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1092, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 107, § 20, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments to this section by House Bill 12-1120 (chapter 27, Session Laws of Colorado 2012) was changed from August 8, 2012, to June 1, 2012, by House Bill 12S-1002 (First Extraordinary Session, chapter 2, p. 2432, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.)

20-1-308. Compensation and expenses - special prosecutors.

The compensation and expenses of special prosecutors appointed pursuant to section 16-5-209 or 20-1-107 shall be paid as follows:

When the special prosecutor is a full-time district attorney, assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney, the county or counties in the judicial district for which the appointment is made shall pay only the ordinary and necessary expenses, including travel, of the special prosecutor, as the judge of the court, which has jurisdiction of the offense being prosecuted, may direct.

In all other cases, the county or counties in the judicial district for which the appointment is made shall pay only the ordinary and necessary expenses, including travel, of the special prosecutor as directed by the judge in addition to a fee for the services of the special prosecutor, which fee shall be approved by the judge but which may not exceed the amount of salary payable to a retired judge sitting in that court or district pursuant to section 5 (3) of article VI of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 859, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 539, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3221, § 393, effective March 1, 2022.

Source:

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3370, § 56, effective August 10.